Hawaii statutes.
§412:10-104 Articles and bylaws. (a)
The applicants shall file with the commissioner proposed articles of
association and bylaws as a part of the application for organization.

(b) The articles of association shall contain,
but shall not be limited to the following provisions:

(1) Name and location of the proposed credit union;

(2) Name and addresses of the chartering applicants
and the number of shares subscribed by each;

(3) Proposed field of membership, specified in
detail; and

(4) Term of the existence of the credit union, which
may be perpetual.

(c) The bylaws shall contain provisions for
the general government of the credit union which are consistent with the
requirements of this article.

(d) In order to simplify the organization of
credit unions, the commissioner shall cause to be prepared model articles of
association and bylaws, consistent with this article, which may be used by
credit union organizers for their guidance. Such articles of association and
bylaws shall be available to persons desiring to organize a credit union. [L
1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next